New York, session 2025-2026, S10707.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The general business law is amended by adding a new section 2 396-eeeee to read as follows: 3 § 396-eeeee. Shock gloves; prohibition and enforcement. 1. No person, 4 firm, corporation, association or agent or employee thereof shall 5 import, manufacture, offer for sale, hold for sale, transfer or distrib- 6 ute shock gloves whether in person or by means of the internet, elec- 7 tronic commerce, telephone, mail or other remote means. As used in this 8 section the term "shock glove" means any glove, glove-like device, or 9 any device designed primarily as a weapon, the purpose of which is to 10 deliver an electrical shock to another person through physical contact, 11 where the electrical shock is capable of stunning, incapacitating, diso- 12 rienting, paralyzing, or causing pain. 13 2. Whenever the attorney general shall believe from evidence satisfac- 14 tory to them that any person, firm, corporation or association or agent 15 or employee thereof has violated any provision of this section, the 16 attorney general may bring an action in the supreme court of the state 17 of New York for a judgment enjoining the continuance of such violation 18 and for a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars for each 19 violation, except that the court may impose a civil penalty of not more 20 than four thousand dollars for each violation if the violation is know- 21 ing and willful. If it shall appear to the satisfaction of the court or 22 justice that the defendant has violated any provision of this section, 23 no proof shall be required that any person has been injured thereby nor 24 that the defendant knowingly or intentionally violated such provision. 25 In such action preliminary relief may be granted under article sixty- 26 three of the civil practice law and rules. 27 3. Before any violation of this section is sought to be enjoined, the 28 attorney general shall be required to give the person against whom such EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD16295-03-6 S. 10707 2 1 proceeding is contemplated notice by certified mail and an opportunity 2 to show in writing within five business days after receipt of notice why 3 proceedings should not be instituted against them, unless the attorney 4 general shall find, in any case in which they seek preliminary relief, 5 that to give such notice and opportunity is not in the public interest. 6 4. In connection with any such proposed action, the attorney general 7 is authorized to take proof, issue subpoenas and administer oaths in the 8 manner provided in the civil practice law and rules. 9 5. If any provision of this section or the application thereof to any 10 person or circumstance is held unconstitutional, such invalidity shall 11 not affect other provisions or applications of this section which can be 12 given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this 13 end the provisions of this section are severable. 14 § 2. Section 265.00 of the penal law is amended by adding a new subdi- 15 vision 15-d to read as follows: 16 15-d. "Shock glove" means any glove, glove-like device, or any device 17 designed primarily as a weapon, the purpose of which is to deliver an 18 electrical shock to another person through physical contact, where the 19 electrical shock is capable of stunning, incapacitating, disorienting, 20 paralyzing, or causing pain. 21 § 3. Subdivision 1 of section 265.01 of the penal law, as amended by 22 chapter 481 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read as follows: 23 (1) [He or she] Such person possesses any firearm, electronic dart 24 gun, electronic stun gun, shock glove, switchblade knife, pilum ballis- 25 tic knife, metal knuckle knife, cane sword, billy, blackjack, bludgeon, 26 plastic knuckles, metal knuckles, chuka stick, sand bag, sandclub, 27 wrist-brace type slingshot or slungshot, shuriken, or throwing star; 28 § 4. The opening paragraph of paragraph 1 of subdivision a of section 29 265.20 of the penal law, as separately amended by chapters 130 and 134 30 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 31 Possession of any of the weapons, instruments, appliances or 32 substances specified in sections 265.01, except shock gloves for the 33 purposes of subparagraphs (a), (b), (c), (d) and (e) of this paragraph, 34 265.01-c, 265.02, 265.03, 265.04, 265.05, 265.50, 265.55 and 270.05 by 35 the following: 36 § 5. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, a person 37 who possesses a shock glove on the effective date of this act shall have 38 sixty days from such effective date to surrender such shock glove to a 39 police department or sheriff's office or otherwise lawfully dispose of 40 such shock glove. A person shall not be guilty of a violation of the 41 penal law based solely upon possession of a shock glove during such 42 sixty-day period, provided that such possession commenced prior to the 43 effective date of this act and is solely for the purpose of surrendering 44 or otherwise lawfully disposing of such shock glove. 45 § 6. The attorney general shall have primary responsibility for 46 enforcement of the provisions of this act relating to the sale, offer 47 for sale, distribution, advertising, or other commercial activity 48 involving shock gloves. The attorney general may promulgate such rules 49 and regulations as are necessary to implement and enforce such 50 provisions, including rules concerning the identification, testing, 51 labeling, and commercial distribution of shock gloves and substantially 52 similar glove, glove-like, or wearable devices, provided that such rules 53 shall be consistent with the definitions and prohibitions established by 54 law. In exercising such authority, the attorney general shall consult 55 with the department of state, including its division of consumer 56 protection, the division of criminal justice services, including the S. 10707 3 1 municipal police training council, and the division of state police, as 2 appropriate, regarding product safety, emerging technologies, conduct- 3 ed-energy devices, forensic testing, and law enforcement considerations, 4 and shall periodically review such definitions in consultation with the 5 department of state, including its division of consumer protection, and 6 the division of criminal justice services, including the municipal 7 police training council, to account for changes in technology and the 8 development of substantially similar devices. The attorney general may 9 coordinate with such agencies and other appropriate federal, state, and 10 local authorities as necessary to carry out the purposes of this act. 11 § 7. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 12 have become a law.